Utah statutes.
76-6-803.90.   Liability -- Defense -- Probable cause -- Reasonableness.

In any action for false arrest, false imprisonment, unlawful detention, defamation of character, assault, trespass, or invasion of civil rights brought by any person detained by an employee of the library, it is a defense to the action that the employee of the library detaining the person had probable cause to believe that the person had committed library theft and that the employee acted reasonably under all circumstances.

